Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-132
Places of amusement; safety regulations; revocation of license.

A city of the second class shall have the power (1) to regulate, license, tax, and suppress places of amusement, (2) to revoke the licenses of such places when they are not provided with sufficient and ample means of exit and entrance or when the licensee has been convicted of any violation of the ordinances in relation to such places, and (3) to declare from time to time when such place or places are unsafe for such uses.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5026;

C.S.1922, § 4195;

C.S.1929, § 17-134;

R.S.1943, § 17-132;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 26.
August 24, 2017
City is not authorized under this section to prohibit playing a game of cards for amusement. In re Sapp, 79 Neb. 781, 113 N.W. 261 (1907).